Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 3
ORGANIZATIONAL STRUCTURE AND OFFICERS
OF STATUTORY TOWNS

31-4-301. Mayor - board of trustees - election - compensation.

The legislative and corporate authority of towns shall be vested in a board of trustees, consisting of one mayor and six trustees, who shall be registered electors who have resided within the limits of the town for a period of at least twelve consecutive months immediately preceding the date of the election; except that, in case of annexation, any person who has resided within the annexed territory for the time prescribed in this subsection (1) shall be deemed to have met the residence requirements for the town to which the territory was annexed.

At the regular election, there shall be elected a mayor for a term of two years and six trustees for terms of two years. Such election shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965".

All officers elected under this section shall hold their offices until their successors are elected and have complied with section 31-4-401, and four members of said board of trustees shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

The mayor and members of the board of trustees shall receive such compensation as fixed by ordinance.

The board of trustees may provide by ordinance for four-year overlapping terms of office for trustees. The ordinance may also provide for four-year terms for the mayor and any officers elected pursuant to section 31-4-304. The board of trustees may reinstate the two-year terms provided for in subsection (2) of this section by ordinance. Any ordinance passed pursuant to this subsection (5) shall be enacted at least one hundred eighty days before the next regular election and is subject, notwithstanding an emergency declaration, to referendum if the referendum is brought pursuant to section 31-11-105 or pursuant to an applicable municipal ordinance enacted in accordance with section 1 of article V of the state constitution. No ordinance enacted pursuant to this subsection (5) shall extend or reduce the term for which any person was elected. If any vacancy occurs in an office for which a four-year term is in effect pursuant to this subsection (5), the board of trustees shall fill such vacancy, as provided in section 31-4-303. If the office in which the vacancy occurs is not an office for which a successor would otherwise have been elected at the next regular election, the term of office of the successor elected at that regular election shall be shortened so that the following regular election for the office is held at the time at which it would have been held if no vacancy had occurred.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1033, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 77:

(3) amended, p. 286, § 58, effective June 29.

L. 79:

(5) amended, p. 1174, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(1), (3), and (5) amended, p. 1257, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(5) amended, p. 699, § 7, effective May 4.

L. 95:

(5) amended, p. 441, § 28, effective May 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-3-301 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", see article 10 of this title.

31-4-301.5. Change in number of trustees.

The trustees of any statutory town may be reduced in number from six to four or again increased from four to six in the manner provided in this section.

When a petition signed by five percent of the registered electors of the town requesting an election for the purpose of reducing the number of trustees from six to four is presented to the board of trustees of the town or when the board determines by majority vote of the entire board that such a reduction in the size of the board would be in the interest of the town, the board shall adopt an ordinance calling for such an election, to be held within four calendar months from the date of presentation of the petition.

Such election may be held in connection with any regular or special election. In the event that the issue is approved at the election, three members of the board of trustees shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, and the legislative and corporate authority of the town shall be vested in the board of trustees consisting of one mayor and four trustees. The approval of a change reducing the number of trustees from six to four shall not have the effect of reducing the term for which any member of the board of trustees was previously elected.

Where the number of trustees has been reduced from six to four, an election on the issue of increasing the number of trustees from four to six may be held at any time subsequent to two years following the election reducing the number of trustees from six to four. No new petition requesting an election to reduce or increase the number of trustees on the board of trustees may be filed or accepted by the board, nor may the board refer any such issue to the voters, for a period of two years following an election for the purpose of increasing or reducing the number of trustees.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 1290, § 9, effective April 6.

31-4-302. Mayor - powers.

The mayor or, in his absence, one of the trustees, who may be elected mayor pro tem, shall preside at all meetings of the board of trustees and shall have the same voting powers as any member of said board. The mayor shall be considered a member of the governing body and the board of trustees. However, a town may provide by ordinance that the mayor shall not be entitled to vote on any matter before the board, except in the case of a tie vote. If such an ordinance is adopted, it shall also provide that any ordinance adopted and all resolutions authorizing the expenditure of money or the entering into of a contract shall be subject to disapproval by the mayor as provided in section 31-16-104. Such an ordinance may provide or may be amended to provide that the mayor shall not be counted for purposes of determining a quorum or for the requisite majority on any matter to be voted on by the board of trustees. Any such ordinance may be adopted, amended, or repealed only within the sixty days preceding any election of a mayor, to take effect upon such mayor's assumption of office.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1034, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1494, § 6, effective June 8.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1291, § 10, effective April 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-3-302 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-303. Trustees to fill vacancy - mayor pro tem - clerk pro tem.

The board of trustees has the power, by appointment, to fill all vacancies in the board or any other office, and the person so appointed shall hold his office until the next regular election and until his successor is elected and has complied with section 31-4-401. The board also has the power to fill a vacancy in the board or in any other elective office of the town by ordering an election to fill the vacancy until the next regular election and until a successor has been elected and has complied with section 31-4-401. If a vacancy in the board or in such other elective office is not filled by appointment or an election is not ordered within sixty days after the vacancy occurs, the board shall order an election, subject to the municipal election code, to be held as soon as practicable to fill the vacancy until the next regular election and until a successor has been elected and has complied with section 31-4-401. At its first meeting, the board shall choose one of the trustees as mayor pro tem who, in the absence of the mayor from any meeting of said board or during the mayor's absence from the town or his inability to act, shall perform the mayor's duties. The board also has the power to elect a clerk pro tem to perform the duties of the clerk during his absence or inability to act.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1034, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1495, § 7, effective June 8.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1257, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 1125, § 6, effective April 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-3-303 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-304. Appointment of officers - compensation.

The board of trustees shall appoint a clerk, treasurer, and town attorney, or shall provide by ordinance for the election of such officers, and may appoint such other officers, including a town administrator, as it deems necessary for the good government of the corporation, and it shall prescribe by ordinance their duties when the same are not defined by law and the compensation or fees they are entitled to receive for their services. The board of trustees may require officers to take an oath or affirmation in accordance with section 24-12-101. The election of officers shall be at the regular election, and no appointment of any officer shall continue beyond thirty days after compliance with section 31-4-401 by the members of the succeeding board of trustees.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1034, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1258, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 745, § 14, effective April 4.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1138), ch. 88, p. 698, § 29, effective August 8; entire section amended, (HB 18-1140), ch. 41, p. 464, § 7, effective August 8.

31-4-305. Clerk - duties.

The clerk shall attend all meetings of the board of trustees and make a true and accurate record of all the proceedings, rules, and ordinances made and passed by the board of trustees. Records of the town shall be open to inspection at all reasonable times and under reasonable regulations established by the town as provided by article 72 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1034, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 746, § 15, effective April 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-3-302 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-306. Marshal or chief of police - powers and duties.

The marshal or chief of police has the same power that sheriffs have by law, coextensive with the county in cases of violation of town ordinances, for offenses committed within the limits of the town. He or she shall execute all writs and processes directed to him or her by the municipal judge in any case arising under a town ordinance and receive the same fees for his or her services that sheriffs are allowed in similar cases. The marshal or chief of police may employ certified peace officers to enforce all laws of the state of Colorado notwithstanding section 16-2.5-201.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1034, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 795, § 7, effective June 3.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 746, § 16, effective April 4.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-066), ch. 105, p. 385, § 2, effective April 4.

31-4-307. Removal of officers - causes - notice.

By a majority vote of all members of the board of trustees, the mayor, the clerk, the treasurer, any member of the board, or any other officer of the town may be removed from office. No such removal shall be made without a charge in writing and an opportunity of hearing being given unless the officer against whom the charge is made has moved out of the limits of the town. When any officer ceases to reside within the limits of the town, he may be removed from office pursuant to this section. A municipal judge may be removed during his term of office only for cause, as set forth in section 13-10-105 (2), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1034, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 795, § 8, effective June 3.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1495, § 8, effective June 8.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 746, § 17, effective April 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-3-306 as it existed prior to 1975.